Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1725
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as it may deem necessary with reference to the conditions under which the practice of massage therapy shall be carried on and the precautions necessary to be employed to prevent the spread of infectious and contagious diseases, other than the practice of massage in mobile massage therapy establishments. The department may, if it deems necessary, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations related to mobile massage therapy establishments. The department shall have the power to enforce the Massage Therapy Practice Act and all necessary inspections in connection therewith.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 622;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 38-1715;

Laws 2019, LB244, § 14.